Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1096.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 110PENNSYLVANIA FOOD BUCKS PROGRAMSec.11001. Scope of chapter.11002. Declaration of purpose.11003. Definitions.11004. Establishment of program.11005. Administration of program.11006. Establishment of account.1234567891011121314151617 11007. Use of available money for program.11008. Regulations.§ 11001. Scope of chapter. This chapter relates to the Pennsylvania Food Bucks Program.§ 11002. Declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The purpose of this chapter is to establish the Pennsylvania Food Bucks Program as a nutrition incentive program for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) recipients to purchase eligible fruits and vegetables at eligible food retailers.(2) Benefit incentive programs similar to the Pennsylvania Food Bucks Program have successfully increased the purchase of fruits and vegetables, increasing nutritious eating and supporting fruit and vegetable farmers.(3) Enacting this chapter will provide the Commonwealth with specific research into best practices to maximize the effectiveness of nutrition incentive programs and measure their impact on Pennsylvania farmers and retailers.§ 11003. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Pennsylvania Food Bucks Program Account established under section 11006(a) (relating to establishment of account)."Benefit incentive." The financial or benefit reward for a SNAP recipient when the SNAP recipient purchases an eligible fruit or vegetable at an eligible food retailer as determined by the grantee.20250HB1096PN1191 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Eligible food retailer." A SNAP-authorized site or food vendor. The term may include a farmer's market, corner store, grocery store or supermarket that redeems SNAP benefits."Eligible fruit or vegetable." A fruit or vegetable that meets the criteria specified in the definition of "food" in 7 U.S.C. § 2012(k) (relating to definitions). The term may include a fruit or vegetable whether fresh, canned, dried or frozen whole or cut without added sugars, fats, oils or salt."Grantee." A Pennsylvania nonprofit organization that qualifies for an exemption from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) selected by the department to administer the program under section 11005(b) (relating to administration of program)."Program." The Pennsylvania Food Bucks Program established under section 11004 (relating to establishment of program)."SNAP." The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program established under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 51 (relating to Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program).§ 11004. Establishment of program.The Pennsylvania Food Bucks Program is established within the department.§ 11005. Administration of program.(a) Administration.--The grantee selected by the department under subsection (b) shall administer the program for a period of no less than two years.(b) Selection of grantee.--The department shall develop eligibility criteria and an application process to select a grantee, who shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Has demonstrated success in administering healthy 20250HB1096PN1191 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 food incentive programming.(2) Is able to apply for a Federal large-scale project grant under the Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-334, 132 Stat. 4490) through the Gus Schumacher Nutrition Incentive Program. (c) Program guidelines.--The grantee, in conjunction with the department, shall develop and establish program standards and incentive criteria for the program, including all of the following requirements:(1) The mechanism for delivering benefit incentives under the program shall be determined by the grantee in consultation with eligible food retailers.(2) The grantee shall provide a benefit incentive of no less than 40¢ to a SNAP recipient for every $1 of SNAP benefits redeemed by the SNAP recipient on eligible fruits or vegetables at eligible food retailers.(d) Program evaluation.--The grantee shall evaluate the program on a biennial basis and post a report with the findings of the evaluation on a publicly accessible Internet website and submit the report to the department and the General Assembly. The grantee shall include all of the following information in the report:(1) The amount of money used for benefit incentives.(2) The geographic distribution and amount of money dispersed at the county level.(3) A list of each participating eligible food retailer.§ 11006. Establishment of account.(a) Establishment of account.--The Pennsylvania Food Bucks Program Account is established as a restricted account in the General Fund and shall be used exclusively for the program in 20250HB1096PN1191 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with this chapter. Money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes of this chapter.(b) Supplements to account.--In addition to money appropriated to the department for the program, the department may also accept gifts, donations, legacies and other revenues, including Federal appropriations, for deposit into the account.§ 11007. Use of available money for program.The grantee shall use money available for the program for the following purposes:(1) Distributing no less than 60% of the money awarded to partner organizations or directly to SNAP recipients for purchasing eligible fruits or vegetables at eligible food retailers.(2) Implementing, promoting, evaluating and making recommendations to improve the program and conduct the report under section 11005(d) (relating to administration of program).§ 11008. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations to implement this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1096PN1191 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122